Illinois, session 104th, SB1926.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Illinois Middle-Income Housing Grant Pilot Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act.7    "Authority" means the Illinois Housing Development 8Authority.9    "Developer" includes for profit and nonprofit developers, 10as well as land banks.11    "Development costs" means any costs associated with the 12construction or rehabilitation of a qualified residence.13    "Household" means all persons using the qualified 14residence as their principal place of residence upon the sale 15or lease of the qualified residence by the developer.16    "Household income" means the combined federal adjusted 17gross income of the members of the household for the taxable 18year immediately preceding the year in which the qualified 19residence is sold or rented to the members of the household.20    "Qualified residence" means a single-family residence that 21(i) is new construction or has been rehabilitated with $30,000 22or more in rehabilitative development costs incurred by the 23taxpayer and (ii) is sold or rented under a contract with a   SB1926- 2 -LRB104 11184 KTG 21266 b1term of one year or longer to one or more individuals with a 2combined household income that exceeds 80% of the median 3household income in Illinois but does not exceed 140% of the 4median household income in Illinois. The residence must also 5have at least a $1,000 local match investment. 6    Section 10. Illinois Middle-Income Housing Grant Pilot 7Program. 8    (a) Subject to appropriation for this purpose, the 9Authority shall establish and administer a 3-year Illinois 10Middle-Income Housing Grant Pilot Program to facilitate 11housing development in targeted communities across the State 12of Illinois. Eligible grant applicants shall include 13developers specifically in any community with an authorized 14River Edge Redevelopment Zone. Any community within this 15designation is eligible to apply to support projects within 16such communities. The Authority may enter into a subcontract 17agreement with developers with qualified residences.18    Awards can be used for both redevelopment and new 19development projects.20    Grant proposals may be submitted to the Authority directly 21to be used as a part of a development agreement with an 22eligible developer. 23    (b) The Authority shall:24        (1) Adopt rules to implement and administer the 25    Illinois Middle-Income Housing Grant Pilot Program,   SB1926- 3 -LRB104 11184 KTG 21266 b1    including rules concerning applications.2        (2) Adopt rules for owner occupied housing, 3    substantially similar to the rental unit rules.4        (3) Create a simple certification process for cities 5    to follow to ensure quick access to funds to facilitate 6    project development.7        (4) Keep record of all requests, including requests 8    above and beyond current funding availability to 9    demonstrate statewide need.10    (c) Grant awards shall be available for eligible 11developers at $20,000 per unit, calculated as 10% of the 12eligible cost of development up to $200,000. 13        (1) The overall cost of the project must remain less 14    than $300,000 per unit.15        (2) Awards shall not exceed $1,000,000 per project.16    (d) Developers must certify that rental units will be 17available at or below the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban 18Development's recommended price point for 140% of area median 19income. 20        (1) The units must remain rented at such threshold for 21    10 years - as certified by the developer and city, and 22    submitted to the Authority. 23        (2) The Authority shall not require income 24    verification by a developer. This requirement shall only 25    apply to units for which the subsidy is utilized to ensure 26    a mix of incomes in housing developments.  SB1926- 4 -LRB104 11184 KTG 21266 b1    (e) The Illinois Middle-Income Housing Grant Pilot Program 2Fund is created as a special fund in the State treasury. The 3fund shall consist of any moneys appropriated to the Illinois 4Housing Development Authority for the Illinois Middle-Income 5Housing Grant Pilot Program and all interest earned on moneys 6in the fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be expended for the 7Illinois Middle-Income Housing Grant Pilot Program and for no 8other purpose. 9    Section 15. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 10Section 5.1030 as follows: 11    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)12    Sec. 5.1030. The Illinois Middle-Income Housing Grant 13Pilot Program Fund.